src/morphology/affixes/verbs-L2.lexc
!! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no

! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.

! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ==========================================================================
!                     North Sámi morphological analyser
! ==========================================================================


!     ================
!! !!!Verb conjugation
!     ================



!    ---------------------------------
!! !!Basic lexica for bisyllabic verbs
!    ---------------------------------


!! !Modals
! ------

!! These are treated separately because
!!  modals do not participate in derivation

LEXICON GALGA_IV !!= * __@CODE@__
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs:%> PrsV ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt:%> PrtV ;
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs:%>Q7ž PotC ;
 +V+IV+Cond:%> CondV1 ;
 +V+IV:%> NominalFormsV1 ;
 +V+IV:%>X2 NominalFormsV4 ;
! +V+IV+Der4+Der/muš+N+Use/-Spell:»mušš@C.NeedNoun@ MUSH ; !L2



LEXICON FERTE_IV !!= * __@CODE@__  
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs:%>Y5 VSufDOHPPE ;
 +V+IV+Cond:%>Y5 CondV2 ;
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs:%>Y5ž PotC ;
 +V+IV+Ind:%>j CSufDOHPPE ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt:%>Y6 PrtV1 ;
 +V+IV:%> NominalFormsV4 ;
 +V+IV:%> NominalFormsV1 ;
! +V+IV+Der4+Der/muš+N+Use/-Spell:»mušš@C.NeedNoun@ MUSH ;!L2


!! !Ordinary bisyllabic verbs
!   -------------------------


LEXICON ARVI_IV  !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyllabic Impersonal Verbs
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsARVI ;
 :%> ARVICnj ;

LEXICON ARVALADDA_IV  !!= * __@CODE@__ Already derived words (except words ending -uššat)
 :%> ARVICnj ;


LEXICON DIEHTI_TV       !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyllabic i-verbs with Personal Passive
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsDIEHTI ;

LEXICON MASSI_TV       !!= * __@CODE@__ No deverbal nouns. Bisyllabic i-verbs with Personal Passive
 +V+TV:%> ASTAStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsDIEHTI ;

LEXICON GILVI_TV       !!= * __@CODE@__ to get rid of gilvohallat. Bisyllabic i-verbs with Personal Passive
 +V+TV:%> GILVIStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsDIEHTI ;


LEXICON BORRA_TV       !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyllabic a- and u-verbs with Personal Passive
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsBORRA ;
 +V+TV+PrfPrc+Err/Orth:Q1n K ;

LEXICON FALLA_TV       !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyllabic a- and u-verbs with Personal Passive
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsFALLA ;


LEXICON ASTA_TV   !!= * __@CODE@__ No deverbal nouns. Bisyllabic a- and u-verbs with Personal Passive
 +V+TV:%> ASTAStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsBORRA ;


LEXICON OAHPPA_TV       !!= * __@CODE@__ Like BORRA but without Deverbal verb -stuvva
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/st+V:»W4st MUITALStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:»W5stalla%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»W5stadda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:»W7stalla%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»W7stadda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/ahtti+V+TV:»W4stahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/asti+V:»W4stas'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:»W4steas'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/l+V:»l MUITALStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»W6ladda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»X2ladda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/ahtti+TV:»lahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/asti:»las'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/easti:»leas'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/h+V+TV:»X4h OAHPAHITStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:»Q4halla%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»Q4hadda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/ahtti+V+TV:»X4hahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/asti+V:»X4has'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:»X4heas'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der2+Der/halla+V:»X6halla%> BOAHTIINCH ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der2+Der/halla+V:»X6hadda%> BOAHTIINCH ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/d+V:»Q8d MUITALStem ;


LEXICON DEAKCU_TV   !!= * __@CODE@__ as BORRA for u-verbs with dim -astit, and a-verbs šith dim -istit that are hardcoded
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsBOLTU ;

LEXICON LEABBU_TV    !!= * __@CODE@__ No deverbal nouns as BORRA for u-verbs with dim -astit, and a-verbs šith dim -istit that are hardcoded
 +V+TV:%> ASTAStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsBOLTU ;


LEXICON DIEHTISHORT_TV       !!= * __@CODE@__ Short actio compound-form
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTISHORTStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsDIEHTI ;

LEXICON DIEHTILONGSHORT_TV       !!= * __@CODE@__ Long and short actio compound-form
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTILONGSHORTStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsDIEHTI ;

LEXICON BAHCCI_TV       !!= * __@CODE@__ Long and short actio compound-form
 +V+TV:%> BAHCCIStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsDIEHTI ;


LEXICON DIEHTALADDA_TV    !!= * __@CODE@__ Already derived words (except words ending -uššat and -httit) - no actio as first part of compounds
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;

LEXICON LAIGOHADDA_TV   !!= * __@CODE@__ No deverbal nouns. Already derived words (except words ending -uššat and -httit) - no actio as first part of compounds
 +V+TV:%> LAIGOHADDAStem ;


LEXICON HAHTTIT_TV    !!= * __@CODE@__ Four-syll kausatives on -httit
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTIStem ;

LEXICON DAHTU_TV  !!= * __@CODE@__  As diehti, but -ut verbs, thus without short passive
 +V+TV:%>Y7j PASSIVE ;
! +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-Spell:»Y7supmái K ;!L2
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTIINCH ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsBORRA ;

LEXICON BOLTU_TV  !!= * __@CODE@__  As dáhtu but with dim -astit that are harcoded
 +V+TV:%>Y7j PASSIVE ;
! +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-Spell:»Y7supmái K ;!L2
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTIINCH ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsBOLTU ;

LEXICON ALBMU_TV   !!= * __@CODE@__ No deverbal nouns. As dáhtu but with dim -astit that are harcoded
 +V+TV:%>Y7j PASSIVE ;
! +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-Spell:»Y7supmái K ;!L2
 +V+TV:%> ASTAINCH ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsBOLTU ;


LEXICON ALLU_IV  !!= * __@CODE@__  -ut verbs, thus without short passive
 +V+IV:%>Y7j SG3PASS ;
 +V+IV:%> BOAHTIINCH ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsDIEVVA ;

LEXICON BARGU_IV  !!= * __@CODE@__  -ut verbs, thus without short passive
 +V+IV:%>Y7j SG3PASS ;
 +V+IV:%> RAIMMAHALLAINCH ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsDIEVVA ;



LEXICON BOAHTI_IV  !!= * __@CODE@__  Bisyllabic i-verbs without Personal Passive but with Der/NomAg
 +V+IV:%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsBOAHTI ;

LEXICON BOAHTILONGSHORT_IV  !!= * __@CODE@__ Long and short actio compound-form
 +V+IV:%> BOAHTILONGSHORTStem ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsBOAHTI ;

LEXICON DIEVVA_IV  !!= * __@CODE@__  Bisyllabic a- and u-verbs without Personal Passive but with Der/NomAg
 +V+IV:%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsDIEVVA ;
 +V+IV+PrfPrc+Err/Orth:Q1n K ;


LEXICON DIEVVA_TV  !!= * __@CODE@__  Bisyllabic a- and u-verbs without Personal Passive but with Der/NomAg (TT: check this)
 +V+TV:%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsDIEVVA ;

 LEXICON BEALLJA_IV  !!= * __@CODE@__ No deverbal nouns Bisyllabic a- and u-verbs without Personal Passive but with Der/NomAg
 +V+IV:%> BEALLJAStem ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsDIEVVA ;


LEXICON BOAZZU_IV  !!= * __@CODE@__ as DIEVVA for u-verbs with dim -astit, that are hardcoded
 +V+IV:%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsBINDU ;
