src/morphology/stems/verbs-L2.lexc
LEXICON Verb
arvat:ar'va DIEVVA_TV ; ! sich trauen +ill, sich wagen +acc
bahčit:bah'či BAHCCI_TV ;
bajánastit:bajánas'ti ARVALADDA_IV ;
beaggit:beaggi BEALLJA_IV ;
bealljat:beallja BEALLJA_IV ;
biktit:bik'ti MASSI_TV ;
bissut:bissu BARGU_IV ;
bivaldallat:bivaldalla ARVALADDA_IV ;
boaldit:boal'di DIEHTILONGSHORT_TV ;
bunjostaddat:bunjostadda DIEHTALADDA_TV ;
buoridahttit:buoridahtti HAHTTIT_TV ;
buođđut:buođđu ASTA_TV ;
báhcit:báh'ci BOAHTI_IV ;
báistit:bájs'ti DIEHTI_TV ;
bálggádahttit:bálggádahtti ARVALADDA_IV ;
bállet:bálle FERTE_IV ;
bárgut:bár'gu BARGU_IV ;
bávdnat:bávdna BORRA_TV ;
ceavvut:ceavvu ARVI_IV ;
cuoigut:cuoj'gu DEAKCU_TV ;
dapmat:dapma DIEVVA_IV ;
deallut:deal'lu DIEHTISHORT_TV ;
deatnut:deatnu BEALLJA_IV ;
doahput:doah'pu DEAKCU_TV ;
doalvut:doal'vu BORRA_TV ;
dovskit:dovs'ki BOAHTI_IV ;
dulkostallat:dulkostalla DIEHTALADDA_TV ;
dáhttut:dáhttu ALBMU_TV ;
dáidit:dáj'di GALGA_IV ;
dáigut:dáj'gu ALLU_IV ;
dálkat:dál'ka ARVI_IV ;
dálvvádahttit:dálvvádahtti ARVALADDA_IV ;
dánsut:dán'su BOLTU_TV ;
dárjut:dár'ju DAHTU_TV ;
eadjit:ead'ji MASSI_TV ;
earbmut:earbmu ARVI_IV ;
eavdáruššat:eavdárušša DIEVVA_IV ;
feastit:feas'ti MASSI_TV ;
fertet:ferte FERTE_IV ;
fállat:fálla FALLA_TV ;
fámohuhttit:fámo7huhtti HAHTTIT_TV ;
galgat:gal'ga GALGA_IV ;
galgat+Err/Sub:gál'ga GALGA_IV ;
gavvit:gavvi DIEHTI_TV ;
geassut:geassu ARVI_IV ;
geavvat:geavva BEALLJA_IV ;
gilljut:gillju BOLTU_TV ;
gilvit:gil'vi GILVI_TV ;
giđđaluvvat:giđđaluvva ARVALADDA_IV ;
goaivut:goaj'vu DEAKCU_TV ;
goarbmut:goarbmu BOAZZU_IV ;
goarrut:goarru BORRA_TV ;
govlut:gov'lu DAHTU_TV ;
guoggut:guoggu BOAZZU_IV ;
guohpanjaddit:guohpa#njaddi BOAHTI_IV ;
guohtut:guoh'tu DIEHTILONGSHORT_TV ;
guorahaddat:guorahadda DIEHTALADDA_TV ;
gurbmut:gurbmu ALLU_IV ;
hearkut:hear'ku DIEVVA_IV ;
huškut:huš'ku ALBMU_TV ;
háitit+Use/LexSub:háj'ti DIEHTI_TV ; ! !XXXDon´t know meaning of this
hárjehahttit:hárjehahtti HAHTTIT_TV ;
hávkut:háv'ku DAHTU_TV ;
hávskut:hávs'ku ALLU_IV ;
jahtat:jah'ta ASTA_TV ;
joavdit:joav'di BOAHTI_IV ;
leabbut:leabbu LEABBU_TV ;
leaibat:leaj'ba BORRA_TV ;
leavdnut:leavdnu ARVI_IV ;
likšut:lik'šu DAHTU_TV ;
loahkáhallat:loahkáhalla ARVALADDA_IV ;
luhčut:luh'ču BOLTU_TV ;
luvvat:luvva BEALLJA_IV ;
láhtut:láh'tu ALBMU_TV ;
láhčit:láh'či MASSI_TV ;
láigohaddat:láigohadda LAIGOHADDA_TV ;
massit:mas'si MASSI_TV ;
maŋádaddat:maŋádadda DIEHTALADDA_TV ;
meaddelvuodjit:meaddel#vuod'ji BOAHTILONGSHORT_IV ;
meahkut:meah'ku BOAZZU_IV ;
mearkut:mear'ku DEAKCU_TV ;
mearrat:mearra ASTA_TV ;
meattávuodjit:meattá#vuod'ji BOAHTILONGSHORT_IV ; 
moardit:moar'di DIEHTI_TV ;
mostut:mos'tu ALLU_IV ;
movttiidahttit:movttiidahtti HAHTTIT_TV ;
nahkat:nah'ka DIEVVA_IV ;
neaskit:neas'ki DIEHTISHORT_TV ;
nissut:nissu ALBMU_TV ;
njahkkit:njahkki BOAHTI_IV ;
njaskut:njas'ku BOLTU_TV ;
njeazzut:njeazzu BOAZZU_IV ;
njoarrat:njoarra FALLA_TV ;
nohkat:noh'ka BEALLJA_IV ;
nuorrat:nuorra ASTA_TV ;
oahppat:oahppa OAHPPA_TV ;
ohcat:oh'ca BORRA_TV ;
olggosbuktit:olggos#buk'ti DIEHTI_TV ;
ovdandivvut:ovdan#divvu DAHTU_TV ;
ruddut:ruddu ALLU_IV ;
rábáluhttit:rábáluhtti HAHTTIT_TV ;
ráhkadastit:ráhkadas'ti DIEHTALADDA_TV ;
ráigat:ráj'ga ASTA_TV ;
ráivut:ráj'vu BOLTU_TV ;
sapmat:sapma DIEVVA_IV ;
savdnjit:savdnji DIEHTILONGSHORT_TV ;
sisačállit:sisa#čálli DIEHTI_TV ;
skeaŋkut:skeaŋ'ku DEAKCU_TV ;
skoalkit:skoal'ki BOAHTI_IV ;
skuđđut:skuđđu DAHTU_TV ;
skárdnjut:skárdnju ALLU_IV ;
skávvut:skávvu ARVI_IV ;
smiehttat:smiehtta BORRA_TV ;
snihpput:snihppu BOLTU_TV ;
surgat:sur'ga ASTA_TV ;
surgit:sur'gi MASSI_TV ;
sáđđat:sáđđa DIEVVA_IV ;
unohastit:unohas'ti DIEHTALADDA_TV ;
uštit:uš'ti MASSI_TV ;
vielgalahttit:vielgalahtti HAHTTIT_TV ;
vilput:vil'pu BOAZZU_IV ;
vuodjit:vuod'ji DIEHTILONGSHORT_TV ;
vuodjut:vuod'ju BOAHTILONGSHORT_IV ;
vuordnut:vuordnu BORRA_TV ;
vuorkut:vuor'ku DEAKCU_TV ;
vuođgŋit:vuođgŋi DIEHTI_TV ;
váiput:váj'pu BOLTU_TV ;
áigut:áj'gu ALBMU_TV ;
áinnádastit:áinnádas'ti ARVALADDA_IV ;
álbmut:álbmu ALBMU_TV ;
čakčut:čak'ču ARVI_IV ;
čallat:čalla ASTA_TV ;
čeallut:čeallu BOAZZU_IV ;
čierostuddat:čiero7studda DIEHTALADDA_TV ;
šloahkkit:šloahkki BOAHTI_IV ;
šnjirgut:šnjir'gu ALLU_IV ;
šnjirralahttit:šnjirralahtti HAHTTIT_TV ;
coakcut+Err/Sub:čoak'ču DAHTU_TV ;! !XXXThis is obviosly wrong
čuohcat:čuoh'ca DIEVVA_TV ;
čuorvut:čuor'vu DEAKCU_TV ;
